Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5768YH (8) 91 th/ns H.F. 2161 Section 1. Section 321P.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 01. A person shall not use an automatic 3 registration plate reader in a local authority unless the 4 governing body of the local authority has adopted an ordinance 5 authorizing the use of a plate reader in the local authority. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 001. A person shall not access an image of 7 a vehicle registration plate, or any other accompanying data, 8 captured by an automatic registration plate reader more than 9 twenty-four hours after the image or data was captured unless 10 a magistrate has issued a search warrant for the specific 11 registration plate number or vehicle or a county attorney has 12 issued a subpoena for the specific registration plate number 13 or vehicle. After a search warrant or subpoena is issued, a 14 person may copy and store a registration plate image and any 15 accompanying data in accordance with subsection 2. A search 16 warrant or subpoena is not required under this subsection in 17 any of the following circumstances: 18 a. When the owner of a vehicle gives voluntary consent 19 authorizing the operator of a plate reader to access an image 20 or accompanying data of the ownerâs vehicle. 21 b. When the owner of a vehicle files a report with a law 22 enforcement agency attesting that the vehicle is lost or 23 stolen. 24 c. When exigent circumstances make it impractical to obtain 25 a search warrant or subpoena before the exigency expires. 26 d. When searching for evidence related to an emergency alert 27 to the public that a child has been abducted and is believed to 28 be in danger of serious bodily harm or death, commonly referred 29 to as an amber alert. 30 e. When searching for evidence related to a violation of 31 section 710A.2. 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. A person who accesses an image of a 33 vehicle registration plate, or any other accompanying data, 34 captured by an automatic registration plate reader shall 35 -1- LSB 5768YH (8) 91 th/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 2161 record the personâs access in a records log maintained by the 1 local authority that authorized the use of the plate reader. 2 A person shall not provide a copy of an image of a vehicle 3 registration plate captured by an automatic registration plate 4 reader, or any other accompanying data, to a nongovernmental 5 third party in this state or to a third party outside of this 6 state. 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 2B. A person shall not use an automatic 8 registration plate reader that is able to recognize or identify 9 a person based on a photograph or recording of the personâs 10 face captured by the plate reader. A person who uses a plate 11 reader shall not use software designed to recognize or identify 12 a person based on a photograph or recording of the personâs 13 face captured by the plate reader. 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 2C. A person shall not place an automatic 15 registration plate reader directed at a church, synagogue, or 16 other established place of religious worship. 17 Sec. 2. Section 321P.4, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 4. a. A person who violates subsection 01, 001, 1 , or 2C 20 commits a simple misdemeanor. 21 b. A person who violates subsection 2A or 2B commits 22 unauthorized computer access in violation of section 716.6B, 23 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 24 Sec. 3. Section 716.6B, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 25 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 a. An aggravated misdemeanor if computer data is accessed 27 that contains a confidential record, as defined in section 28 22.7 , an image of a vehicle registration plate or any other 29 accompanying data captured by an automatic registration plate 30 reader in violation of section 321P.4, subsection 2A or 2B, 31 operational or support data of a public utility, as defined 32 in section 476.1 , operational or support data of a rural 33 water district incorporated pursuant to chapter 357A or 504 , 34 operational or support data of a municipal utility organized 35 -2- LSB 5768YH (8) 91 th/ns 2/ 4 H.F. 2161 pursuant to chapter 388 or 389 , operational or support data 1 of a public airport, or a trade secret, as defined in section 2 550.2 . 3